Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-209.01
Blighted area, defined.

Blighted area has the same meaning as in section 18-2103.

Laws 1984, LB 1084, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 11;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 24.